New York, session 2025-2026, A4242.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 305 of the education law is amended by adding a new 2 subdivision 63 to read as follows: 3 63. a. The commissioner shall consult and collaborate with the commis- 4 sioner of health to establish and develop a bleeding control kit program 5 within the department that: 6 (i) ensures that bleeding control kits are stored in easily accessible 7 areas of the school; 8 (ii) includes the use of bleeding control kits in the emergency oper- 9 ations plan or any other security planning measure or protocol adopted 10 by the school district, board of cooperative educational services, char- 11 ter school or nonpublic school; and 12 (iii) requires all district or school personnel who may be reasonably 13 expected to use a bleeding control kit in the event of an injury to 14 another person to receive training approved by the department. 15 b. A bleeding control kit required pursuant to this subdivision shall 16 be a first aid response kit that includes at least: 17 (i) one tourniquet; 18 (ii) two compressed gauze dressings; 19 (iii) one trauma dressing; 20 (iv) nitrile gloves; 21 (v) scissors; and 22 (vi) instructional documents adopted by the agency detailing methods 23 to prevent blood loss following a traumatic event. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD01221-01-5 A. 4242 2 1 c. In addition to the items required to be included in a bleeding 2 control kit pursuant to paragraph b of this subdivision, a bleeding 3 control kit may also include any medical material or equipment that: 4 (i) may be readily stored in a bleeding control kit; 5 (ii) may be used to adequately treat an injury involving traumatic 6 blood loss; and 7 (iii) is approved by local law enforcement or emergency medical 8 services personnel. 9 d. Each school district, board of cooperative educational services, 10 charter school or nonpublic school shall conduct an annual inspection of 11 the medical material and equipment in each bleeding control kit and 12 replace any expired material or equipment as necessary. 13 e. Each school district, board of cooperative educational services, 14 charter school or nonpublic school shall restock each bleeding control 15 kit as soon as practicable after the use of such kit to ensure that the 16 kit contains all required material and equipment. 17 f. The department may approve an online course of instruction by the 18 American College of Surgeons or a similar organization to satisfy the 19 training required pursuant to subparagraph (iii) of paragraph a of this 20 subdivision. 21 g. A school district, board of cooperative educational services, char- 22 ter school or nonpublic school shall be immune from civil liability from 23 damages or injuries resulting from the good faith use of a bleeding 24 control kit by an employee of such school district, board of cooperative 25 educational services, charter school or nonpublic school to control the 26 bleeding of an injured person provided that the employee received the 27 training required pursuant to subparagraph (iii) of paragraph a of this 28 subdivision and the employee did not act with gross negligence in the 29 use of the bleeding control kit. 30 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately.